Virginia statutes. Constitution of Virginia [1971]
Article IV. Legislature.

§ 1. Legislative power.

The legislative power of the Commonwealth shall be vested in a General Assembly, which shall consist of a Senate and House of Delegates.

Law Review.

For article on state constitutional law processes, see 24 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 169 (1983).

For essay, “Marshall v. Northern Virginia Transportation Authority: The Supreme Court of Virginia Rules that Taxes Can Be Imposed By Elected Bodies Only,” see
43 U. Rich. L. Rev. 51 (2008).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

10B M.J. Intoxicating Liquors, § 2;
12A M.J. Limitation of Actions, § 34.1.

§ 2. Senate.

The Senate shall consist of not more than forty and not less than thirty-three members, who shall be elected quadrennially by the voters of the several senatorial districts on the Tuesday succeeding the first Monday in November.

Cross references.

For statutory provisions as to state senatorial districts and when senators are elected, see §

24.2-214

.

Law Review.

For note discussing the 1981 redistricting process in Virginia, see 68 Va. L. Rev. 541 (1982).

For annual survey of Virginia law article, “Administrative Law,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 7 (2012).

§ 3. House of Delegates.

The House of Delegates shall consist of not more than one hundred and not less than ninety members, who shall be elected biennially by the voters of the several house districts on the Tuesday succeeding the first Monday in November.

Cross references.

For statutory provisions as to election and apportionment of delegates, see §

24.2-215

.

Law Review.

For note discussing the 1981 redistricting process in Virginia, see 68 Va. L. Rev. 541 (1982).

§ 4. Qualifications of senators and delegates.

Any person may be elected to the Senate who, at the time of the election, is twenty-one years of age, is a resident of the senatorial district which he is seeking to represent, and is qualified to vote for members of the General Assembly. Any person may be elected to the House of Delegates who, at the time of the election, is twenty-one years of age, is a resident of the house district which he is seeking to represent, and is qualified to vote for members of the General Assembly. A senator or delegate who moves his residence from the district for which he is elected shall thereby vacate his office.

No person holding a salaried office under the government of the Commonwealth, and no judge of any court, attorney for the Commonwealth, sheriff, treasurer, assessor of taxes, commissioner of the revenue, collector of taxes, or clerk of any court shall be a member of either house of the General Assembly during his continuance in office; and his qualification as a member shall vacate any such office held by him. No person holding any office or post of profit or emolument under the United States government, or who is in the employment of such government, shall be eligible to either house.

Cross references.

As to disabilities for holding office and qualifications of voters, see §§

2.2-2800

,

24.2-400

through

24.2-403

and Va. Const., Art. II, § 1.

For qualifications of elected officers, see Va. Const., Art. II, § 5.

§ 5. Compensation; election to civil office of profit.

The members of the General Assembly shall receive such salary and allowances as may be prescribed by law, but no increase in salary shall take effect for a given member until after the end of the term for which he was elected. No member during the term for which he shall have been elected shall be elected by the General Assembly to any civil office of profit in the Commonwealth.

Cross references.

For statutes concerning salaries of members of the General Assembly, see §§ 30-19.11, 30-19.12.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
15 M.J. Public Officers, § 44;
15 M.J. Public Service and State Corporation Commissions, § 3;
17 M.J. State, §§ 5, 9.

§ 6. Legislative sessions.

The General Assembly shall meet once each year on the second Wednesday in January. Except as herein provided for reconvened sessions, no regular session of the General Assembly convened in an even-numbered year shall continue longer than sixty days; no regular session of the General Assembly convened in an odd-numbered year shall continue longer than thirty days; but with the concurrence of two-thirds of the members elected to each house, any regular session may be extended for a period not exceeding thirty days. Neither house shall, without the consent of the other, adjourn to another place, nor for more than three days.

The Governor may convene a special session of the General Assembly when, in his opinion, the interest of the Commonwealth may require and shall convene a special session upon the application of two-thirds of the members elected to each house.

The General Assembly shall reconvene on the sixth Wednesday after adjournment of each regular or special session for the purpose of considering bills which may have been returned by the Governor with recommendations for their amendment and bills and items of appropriation bills which may have been returned by the Governor with his objections. No other business shall be considered at a reconvened session. Such reconvened session shall not continue longer than three days unless the session be extended, for a period not exceeding seven additional days, upon the vote of the majority of the members elected to each house. The General Assembly may provide, by a joint resolution approved during a regular or special session by the vote of the majority of the members elected to each house, that it shall reconvene on a date after the sixth Wednesday after adjournment of the regular or special session but no later than the seventh Wednesday after adjournment.

Cross references.

For statutory provisions as to time and place of meeting, see § 30-1.

Amendment ratified Nov. 6, 2012. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 2011 Session (Acts 2011, c. 756), and was referred to the 2012 Regular Session. It was again agreed to at that session (Acts 2012, cc. 533 and 737) and submitted to the people November 6, 2012, when it was ratified. The amendment, effective January 1, 2013, added the last sentence in the third paragraph.

Proposed amendment not agreed to by General Assembly. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1991 Session (Acts 1991, c. 641) and was referred to the 1992 Session. At the 1992 Session the General Assembly did not again agree to the amendment.

Defeat of proposed amendment. —

An amendment to this section proposed and agreed to by Acts 1981, c. 638 and Acts 1982, cc. 504, 687, and submitted to the people Nov. 2, 1982, was defeated.

Proposed amendment not submitted to voters. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1977 Session (Acts 1977, c. 688), and referred to the 1978 Session. It was again agreed to at that session (Acts 1978, cc. 806, 852). The 1978 act agreeing to the amendment was held unconstitutional by the State Supreme Court, because it did not include an amendment to Va. Const., Art. IV, § 13, also agreed to in Acts 1977, c. 688, and the amendment to this section was therefore not submitted to the people.

The YYYY amendments.

Amendment ratified Nov. 4, 1980. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1979 Session (Acts 1979, c. 742) and the 1980 Session (Acts 1980, cc. 636, 763) and ratified by the people at the general election held Nov. 4, 1980. The amendment added “Except as herein provided for reconvened sessions” at the beginning of the second sentence of the first paragraph and added the third paragraph.

Law Review.

For survey of constitutional law for the year 1976-77, see 63 Va. L. Rev. 1385 (1977).

§ 7. Organization of General Assembly.

The House of Delegates shall choose its own Speaker; and, in the absence of the Lieutenant Governor, or when he shall exercise the office of Governor, the Senate shall choose from its own body a president pro tempore. Each house shall select its officers and settle its rules of procedure. The houses may jointly provide for legislative continuity between sessions occurring during the term for which members of the House of Delegates are elected. Each house may direct writs of election for supplying vacancies which may occur during a session of the General Assembly. If vacancies exist while the General Assembly is not in session, such writs may be issued by the Governor under such regulations as may be prescribed by law. Each house shall judge of the election, qualification, and returns of its members, may punish them for disorderly behavior, and, with the concurrence of two-thirds of its elected membership, may expel a member.

Cross references.

As to special elections, see §§

24.2-682

,

24.2-683

.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Expulsion of member. —

Circuit court dismissed a petition for the judicial recall of a senator alleging misuse of office regarding her alleged conduct and actions related to a protest of a Confederate Civil War statue because the court lacked jurisdiction since the state constitution provided the sole and exclusive method for removal. Commonwealth v. Lucas, 108 Va. Cir. 284, 2021 Va. Cir. LEXIS 145 (Chesapeake July 2, 2021).

Power to discipline.

Virginia General Assembly's broad power to discipline and expel member legislators means each house may ascertain and weigh the extent to which an individual participated in the attack on the U.S. Capitol on January 6, 2021, and whether it warrants discipline or expulsion. See opinion of Attorney General to the Honorable Lee J. Carter, Member, Virginia House of Delegates, 21-003, 2021 Va. AG LEXIS 10 (1/10/21).

§ 8. Quorum.

A majority of the members elected to each house shall constitute a quorum to do business, but a smaller number may adjourn from day to day and shall have power to compel the attendance of members in such manner and under such penalty as each house may prescribe. A smaller number, not less than two-fifths of the elected membership of each house, may meet and may, notwithstanding any other provision of this Constitution, enact legislation if the Governor by proclamation declares that a quorum of the General Assembly cannot be convened because of enemy attack upon the soil of Virginia. Such legislation shall remain effective only until thirty days after a quorum of the General Assembly can be convened.

§ 9. Immunity of legislators.

Members of the General Assembly shall, in all cases except treason, felony, or breach of the peace, be privileged from arrest during the sessions of their respective houses; and for any speech or debate in either house shall not be questioned in any other place. They shall not be subject to arrest under any civil process during the sessions of the General Assembly, or during the fifteen days before the beginning or after the ending of any session.

Cross references.

For statutory provisions regarding privileges of members of General Assembly, see §§ 30-6, 30-7, 30-9.

Law Review.

For article, “The Neglected Value of the Legislative Privilege in State Legislatures,” see 45 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 221 (2003).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
2A M.J. Arrest, § 2;
3A M.J. Breach of the Peace, § 2;
17 M.J. State, § 6.

§ 10. Journal of proceedings.

Each house shall keep a journal of its proceedings, which shall be published from time to time. The vote of each member voting in each house on any question shall, at the desire of one-fifth of those present, be recorded in the journal. On the final vote on any bill, and on the vote in any election or impeachment conducted in the General Assembly or on the expulsion of a member, the name of each member voting in each house and how he voted shall be recorded in the journal.

Law Review.

For an article, “Constitutional Law,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1043 (1998).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
17 M.J. Statutes, § 24.

§ 11. Enactment of laws.

No law shall be enacted except by bill. A bill may originate in either house, may be approved or rejected by the other, or may be amended by either, with the concurrence of the other.

No bill shall become a law unless, prior to its passage:

it has been referred to a committee of each house, considered by such committee in session, and reported;

it has been printed by the house in which it originated prior to its passage therein;

it has been read by its title, or its title has been printed in a daily calendar, on three different calendar days in each house; and

upon its final passage a vote has been taken thereon in each house, the name of each member voting for and against recorded in the journal, and a majority of those voting in each house, which majority shall include at least two-fifths of the members elected to that house, recorded in the affirmative.

Only in the manner required in subdivision (d) of this section shall an amendment to a bill by one house be concurred in by the other, or a conference report be adopted by either house, or either house discharge a committee from the consideration of a bill and consider the same as if reported. The printing and reading, or either, required in subdivisions (b) and (c) of this section, may be dispensed with in a bill to codify the laws of the Commonwealth, and in the case of an emergency by a vote of four-fifths of the members voting in each house, the name of each member voting and how he voted to be recorded in the journal.

No bill which creates or establishes a new office, or which creates, continues, or revives a debt or charge, or which makes, continues, or revives any appropriation of public or trust money or property, or which releases, discharges, or commutes any claim or demand of the Commonwealth, or which imposes, continues, or revives a tax, shall be passed except by the affirmative vote of a majority of all the members elected to each house, the name of each member voting and how he voted to be recorded in the journal.

Every law imposing, continuing, or reviving a tax shall specifically state such tax. However, any law by which taxes are imposed may define or specify the subject and provisions of such tax by reference to any provision of the laws of the United States as those laws may be or become effective at any time or from time to time, and may prescribe exceptions or modifications to any such provision.

The presiding officer of each house or upon his inability or failure to act a person designated by a majority of the members elected to each house shall, not later than three days after each bill is enrolled, sign each bill that has been passed by both houses and duly enrolled. The fact of signing shall be recorded in the journal.

Cross references.

As to commencement of statutes and time when laws take effect, see §

1-214

of the Code and Va. Const., Art. IV, § 13.

Proposed amendment not submitted to voters. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1977 Session (Acts 1977, c. 688), and referred to the 1978 Session. It was again agreed to at that session (Acts 1978, cc. 806, 852). The 1978 act agreeing to the amendment was held unconstitutional by the State Supreme Court, because it did not include an amendment to Va. Const., Art. IV, § 13, also agreed to in Acts 1977, c. 688, and the amendment to this section was therefore not submitted to the people.

The YYYY amendments.

Amendment ratified Nov. 4, 1980. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1979 Session (Acts 1979, c. 742) and the 1980 Session (Acts 1980, cc. 636, 763) and ratified by the people at the general election held Nov. 4, 1980. The amendment substituted “or upon his inability or failure to act a person designated by a majority of the members elected to each house shall, not later than three days after each bill is enrolled, sign each” for “shall, not later than twenty days after adjournment, sign every” in the last paragraph.

Law Review.

For survey of constitutional law for the year 1976-77, see 63 Va. L. Rev. 1385 (1977).

For article, “Legislative and Executive Veto of Rules of Administrative Agencies: Models and Alternatives,” see 24 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 79 (1982).

For essay, “Marshall v. Northern Virginia Transportation Authority: The Supreme Court of Virginia Rules that Taxes Can Be Imposed By Elected Bodies Only,” see
43 U. Rich. L. Rev. 51 (2008).

For article, “Friction By Design: The Necessary Contest of State Judicial Power and Legislative Policymaking,” see 43 U. Rich. L. Rev. 571 (2009).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
13B M.J. Municipal Corporations, § 117;
17 M.J. Statutes, §§ 4, 82;
18 M.J. Taxation, § 22.

§ 12. Form of laws.

No law shall embrace more than one object, which shall be expressed in its title. Nor shall any law be revived or amended with reference to its title, but the act revived or the section amended shall be reenacted and published at length.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on constitutional law for the year 1972-1973, see 59 Va. L. Rev. 1445 (1973).

For essay, “Marshall v. Northern Virginia Transportation Authority: The Supreme Court of Virginia Rules that Taxes Can Be Imposed By Elected Bodies Only,” see
43 U. Rich. L. Rev. 51 (2008).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
2B M.J. Automobiles, § 80;
5A M.J. Courts, § 2;
9B M.J. Horse and Dog Racing, § 1;
17 M.J. Statutes, §§ 5-8, 13, 14, 19, 30, 83, 84, 90;
19 M.J. Warehouses and Warehousemen, § 3.

§ 13. Effective date of laws.

All laws enacted at a regular session, including laws which are enacted by reason of actions taken during the reconvened session following a regular session, but excluding a general appropriation law, shall take effect on the first day of July following the adjournment of the session of the General Assembly at which it has been enacted; and all laws enacted at a special session, including laws which are enacted by reason of actions taken during the reconvened session following a special session but excluding a general appropriation law, shall take effect on the first day of the fourth month following the month of adjournment of the special session; unless in the case of an emergency (which emergency shall be expressed in the body of the bill) the General Assembly shall specify an earlier date by a vote of four-fifths of the members voting in each house, the name of each member voting and how he voted to be recorded in the journal, or unless a subsequent date is specified in the body of the bill or by general law.

Cross references.

As to effective date of legislative reapportionment laws, see Va. Const., Art. II, § 6.

As to dispensing with the printing and reading of bills in case of emergency, see Va. Const., Art. IV, § 11.

For statutory provision as to commencement of statutes, see §

1-214

.

Proposed amendment not agreed to second time. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1977 Session (Acts 1977, c. 688), and referred to the 1978 Session, but was not agreed to at that session.

The YYYY amendments.

Amendment ratified Nov. 4, 1980. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1979 Session (Acts 1979, c. 742) and the 1980 Session (Acts 1980, cc. 636, 763) and ratified by the people at the general election held Nov. 4, 1980.

Law Review.

For survey of constitutional law for the year 1977-1978, see 64 Va. L. Rev. 1397 (1978).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
17 M.J. Statutes, §§ 21, 23, 73.

§ 14. Powers of General Assembly; limitations.

The authority of the General Assembly shall extend to all subjects of legislation not herein forbidden or restricted; and a specific grant of authority in this Constitution upon a subject shall not work a restriction of its authority upon the same or any other subject. The omission in this Constitution of specific grants of authority heretofore conferred shall not be construed to deprive the General Assembly of such authority, or to indicate a change of policy in reference thereto, unless such purpose plainly appear.

The General Assembly shall confer on the courts power to grant divorces, change the names of persons, and direct the sales of estates belonging to infants and other persons under legal disabilities, and shall not, by special legislation, grant relief in these or other cases of which the courts or other tribunals may have jurisdiction.

The General Assembly may regulate the exercise by courts of the right to punish for contempt.

The General Assembly’s power to define the accrual date for a civil action based on an intentional tort committed by a natural person against a person who, at the time of the intentional tort, was a minor shall include the power to provide for the retroactive application of a change in the accrual date.
No natural person shall have a constitutionally protected property right to bar a cause of action based on intentional torts as described herein on the ground that a change in the accrual date for the action has been applied retroactively or that a statute of limitations or statute of repose has expired.

The General Assembly shall not enact any local, special, or private law in the following cases:

For the punishment of crime.

Providing a change of venue in civil or criminal cases.

Regulating the practice in, or the jurisdiction of, or changing the rules of evidence in any judicial proceedings or inquiry before the courts or other tribunals, or providing or changing the methods of collecting debts or enforcing judgments or prescribing the effect of judicial sales of real estate.

Changing or locating county seats.

For the assessment and collection of taxes, except as to animals which the General Assembly may deem dangerous to the farming interests.

Extending the time for the assessment or collection of taxes.

Exempting property from taxation.

Remitting, releasing, postponing, or diminishing any obligation or liability of any person, corporation, or association to the Commonwealth or to any political subdivision thereof.

Refunding money lawfully paid into the treasury of the Commonwealth or the treasury of any political subdivision thereof.

Granting from the treasury of the Commonwealth, or granting or authorizing to be granted from the treasury of any political subdivision thereof, any extra compensation to any public officer, servant, agent, or contractor.

For registering voters, conducting elections, or designating the places of voting.

Regulating labor, trade, mining, or manufacturing, or the rate of interest on money.

Granting any pension.

Creating, increasing, or decreasing, or authorizing to be created, increased, or decreased, the salaries, fees, percentages, or allowances of public officers during the term for which they are elected or appointed.

Declaring streams navigable, or authorizing the construction of booms or dams therein, or the removal of obstructions therefrom.

Affecting or regulating fencing or the boundaries of land, or the running at large of stock.

Creating private corporations, or amending, renewing, or extending the charters thereof.

Granting to any private corporation, association, or individual any special or exclusive right, privilege, or immunity.

Naming or changing the name of any private corporation or association.

Remitting the forfeiture of the charter of any private corporation, except upon the condition that such corporation shall thereafter hold its charter subject to the provisions of this Constitution and the laws passed in pursuance thereof.

Cross references.

As to property held for religious purposes, see §§

57-7.1

through

57-17

.

Proposed amendment not agreed to second time. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 2017 Session (Acts 2017, c. 769), and was referred to the 2018 Regular Session. At the 2018 Session the General Assembly did not again agree to the amendment.

Amendment ratified Nov. 7, 2006. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 2005 Session and the 2006 Session (Acts 2006, cc. 68 and 945), and ratified by the people at the general election held Nov. 7, 2006. The amendment, effective January 1, 2007, deleted the last paragraph of the section, which read: “The General Assembly shall not grant a charter of incorporation to any church or religious denomination, but may secure the title to church property to an extent to be limited by law.”

Amendment ratified Nov. 8, 1994. —

An amendment to the section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1993 Session (Acts 1993, c. 892) and the 1994 Session (Acts 1994, cc. 405 and 818), and ratified by the people at the general election held Nov. 8, 1994. The amendment, effective January 1, 1995, added the fourth paragraph.

Amendment defeated Nov. 5, 1996. —

An amendment to this section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 1995 Regular Session (Acts 1995, c. 707) and was referred to the 1996 Session. It was again agreed to at that Session (Acts 1996, cc. 296 and 908) and was submitted to the people November 5, 1996, when it was defeated.

Law Review.

For article on local bills, see 42 Va. L. Rev. 845 (1956).

For note, “Special Legislation in Virginia,” see 42 Va. L. Rev. 860 (1956).

For discussion of the constitutionality of medical malpractice review panels, see 34 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1179 (1977).

For comment, “Scope of Permissible Pretrial Discovery of Medical Malpractice Review Panel Deliberations in Virginia: Klarfeld v. Salsbury,” see 10 G.M.U. L. Rev. 577 (1988).

For note, “Will Tort Reform Combat the Medical Malpractice Insurance Availability and Affordability Problems That Virginia’s Physicians Are Facing,” see 44 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1463 (1988).

For a review of civil practice and procedure in Virginia for year 1999, see 33 U. Rich. L. Rev. 801 (1999).

For a comment, “Slowing Union Corruption:
Reforming the Landrum-Griffin Act to Better Combat Union Embezzlement,” see 8 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 527 (2000).

For 2003/2004 survey of the law of taxation, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 413 (2004).

For essay, “Marshall v. Northern Virginia Transportation Authority: The Supreme Court of Virginia Rules that Taxes Can Be Imposed By Elected Bodies Only,” see
43 U. Rich. L. Rev. 51 (2008).

For comment, “Lifting the Fog: Ending Felony Disenfranchisement in Virginia,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 471 (2012).

For article, “No Arbitrary Power: An Originalist Theory of the Due Process of Law,” see 60 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 1599 (2019).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
4A M.J. Contempt, §§ 6, 22;
4B M.J. Corporations, § 14;
5A M.J. Counties, § 10;
6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony, § 23.2;
6B M.J. Elections, § 2;
12A M.J. Licenses, § 6;
13B M.J. Municipal Corporations, § 4;
16 M.J. Religious Societies, §§ 4, 7;
17 M.J. Statutes, § 16;
18 M.J. Surface Transportation Systems, § 72;
18 M.J. Taxation, § 5;
19 M.J. Venue, § 17;
21 M.J. Workers’ Compensation, § 21.

§ 15. General laws.

In all cases enumerated in the preceding section, and in every other case which, in its judgment, may be provided for by general laws, the General Assembly shall enact general laws. Any general law shall be subject to amendment or repeal, but the amendment or partial repeal thereof shall not operate directly or indirectly to enact, and shall not have the effect of enactment of, a special, private, or local law.

No general or special law shall surrender or suspend the right and power of the Commonwealth, or any political subdivision thereof, to tax corporations and corporate property, except as authorized by Article X. No private corporation, association, or individual shall be specially exempted from the operation of any general law, nor shall a general law’s operation be suspended for the benefit of any private corporation, association, or individual.

Law Review.

For article on local bills, see 42 Va. L. Rev. 845 (1956).

For note, “Special Legislation in Virginia,” see 42 Va. L. Rev. 860 (1956).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

17 M.J. Statutes, §§ 16, 108;
18 M.J. Taxation, § 28.

§ 16. Appropriations to religious or charitable bodies.

The General Assembly shall not make any appropriation of public funds, personal property, or real estate to any church or sectarian society, or any association or institution of any kind whatever which is entirely or partly, directly or indirectly, controlled by any church or sectarian society. Nor shall the General Assembly make any like appropriation to any charitable institution which is not owned or controlled by the Commonwealth; the General Assembly may, however, make appropriations to nonsectarian institutions for the reform of youthful criminals and may also authorize counties, cities, or towns to make such appropriations to any charitable institution or association.

Cross references.

For statutory provisions regarding donations to charities, etc., by counties, cities, and towns, see §§

15.2-953

,

15.2-954

, and

15.2-972

.

Law Review.

For note on enforcing separation of church and state through state constitutional provisions, see 71 Va. L. Rev. 625 (1985).

For article, “Friction By Design: The Necessary Contest of State Judicial Power and Legislative Policymaking,” see 43 U. Rich. L. Rev. 571 (2009).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
16 M.J. Religious Societies, § 3.

§ 17. Impeachment.

The Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Attorney General, judges, members of the State Corporation Commission, and all officers appointed by the Governor or elected by the General Assembly, offending against the Commonwealth by malfeasance in office, corruption, neglect of duty, or other high crime or misdemeanor may be impeached by the House of Delegates and prosecuted before the Senate, which shall have the sole power to try impeachments. When sitting for that purpose, the senators shall be on oath or affirmation, and no person shall be convicted without the concurrence of two thirds of the senators present. Judgment in case of impeachment shall not extend further than removal from office and disqualification to hold and enjoy any office of honor, trust, or profit under the Commonwealth; but the person convicted shall nevertheless be subject to indictment, trial, judgment, and punishment according to law. The Senate may sit during the recess of the General Assembly for the trial of impeachments.

Cross references.

As to assumption of duties by Joint Legislative Audit and Review Commission upon failure of Auditor to perform; procedure, see § 30-142.

Law Review.

For the proposal for the removal or retirement of unfit judges, see 54 Va. L. Rev. 554 (1968).

For survey of Virginia law on practice and pleading for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1799 (1975).

For
comment, “Guarding the Guardians: Judge’s Rights and Virginia’s Judicial Inquiry and Review Commission,” see 43 U. Rich. L. Rev. 473 (2008).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
11A M.J. Judges, § 26.

§ 18. Auditor of Public Accounts.

An Auditor of Public Accounts shall be elected by the joint vote of the two houses of the General Assembly for the term of four years. His powers and duties shall be prescribed by law.

Cross references.

As to the election, term and compensation of the Auditor of Public Accounts, see § 30-130.

§ 19. Legislative review of administrative rules.

Proposed amendment not agreed to second time at the 2018 Session. —

This section was proposed and agreed to by the General Assembly at the 2017 Session (Acts 2017, c. 772), and was referred to the 2018 Regular Session. At the 2018 Session the General Assembly did not again agree to the amendment.